Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1121.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1372.2. Access to Private Pay Services.--(a) A school entity shall allow a private pay provider, who has been contracted by a parent of a student with autism spectrum disorder or developmental delays, access to the student during school hours to provide private pay services in the least restrictive environment, including classroom settings, as determined by the student's IEP or service agreement.(b) A private pay provider shall coordinate with the 12345678910111213141516171819 student's IEP team and school staff to ensure that private pay services only include services specifically required under the student's IEP and that private pay services are integrated effectively into the student's school day without disrupting the overall classroom environment.(c) Written consent from the parent or legal guardian of the student shall be required for the provision of private pay services during school hours. A parent or legal guardian shall retain the right to choose the private pay provider that provides private pay services to the child.(d) A behavior analyst shall supervise private pay services in accordance with national certification standards, and shall ensure the quality and fidelity of delivered private pay services.(e) A school entity shall cooperate in providing necessary accommodations for private pay providers to deliver private pay services, including classroom access, appropriate space and coordination with school personnel.(f) A school entity may not:(1) charge fees, impose conditions or place barriers that would hinder or prevent private pay providers from accessing students during school hours, provided that the private pay services are aligned with the student's educational and developmental needs;(2) discriminate against or deny educational benefits or rights to a student who receives private pay services;(3) retaliate against a student, parent or legal guardian, or private pay provider for seeking or delivering private pay services on school premises; or(4) be held responsible for the cost of private pay services 20250HB1121PN1249 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided under this section, unless otherwise agreed to as part of a student's IEP or other legal agreement.(g) In the event of a disagreement between a school entity and a private pay provider, parent or legal guardian regarding access or service provision that cannot be resolved by the school entity and private pay provider, parent or legal guardian, an impartial hearing officer shall be appointed to resolve the dispute, with priority given to the best interests of the student.(h) A private pay provider shall complete all background checks required under State law, including those required of school employees under section 111, and provide proof of licensure and certification to the school entity before providing services on school premises.(i) The department, in consultation with relevant agencies and stakeholders, shall develop guidelines and best practices to facilitate the implementation of this section, including model agreements for private pay providers and school entities. The department shall distribute the guidelines and best practices to each school entity and make them available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(j) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applied behavior analysis." The design, implementation and evaluation of environmental modifications, using behavioral stimuli and consequences, to produce socially significant improvement in human behavior, including the use of direct observation, measurement and functional analysis of the relations between environmental and behavior.20250HB1121PN1249 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Behavior analyst." An individual who is nationally certified as a board-certified behavior analyst, or as a board-certified assistant analyst, and who oversees a registered behavior technician during the normal course of the behavior analyst's professional duties."Behavior technician." An individual who is licensed or certified to provide applied behavior analysis and is supervised by a behavior analyst."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."IEP." A written statement for a child with a disability that is developed, reviewed or revised in a meeting in accordance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Public Law 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 14 (relating to special education services and programs)."Private pay provider." A behavior analyst or behavior technician who:(1) provides applied behavior analysis to a student;(2) is not employed or contracted directly by a school entity; and(3) is compensated privately by the student's family or an external entity."Private pay services." Applied behavior analysis provided by a private pay provider on school premises."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school or regional charter school operating within this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1121PN1249 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728